Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-315
Nebraska veterans homes; establishment.

(1) The Grand Island Veterans' Home, the Norfolk Veterans' Home, the Thomas Fitzgerald Veterans' Home, and the Western Nebraska Veterans' Home are established. On July 1, 2007, the Eastern Nebraska Veterans' Home is established. The State of Nebraska shall maintain the homes as provided in sections 80-314 to 80-331.

(2) The veterans' home known as the Thomas Fitzgerald Veterans' Home as of July 14, 2006, shall continue to be known by that name until July 1, 2007. On and after July 1, 2007, the veterans' home shall be known as the Eastern Nebraska Veterans' Home.

Laws 1887, c. 82, § 1, p. 622;

Laws 1889, c. 85, § 1, p. 569;

Laws 1891, c. 49, § 1, p. 340;

Laws 1901, c. 71, § 1, p. 458;

R.S.1913, § 7302;

Laws 1919, c. 157, § 1, p. 354;

C.S.1922, § 6957;

C.S.1929, § 80-301;

Laws 1931, c. 153, § 1, p. 412;

Laws 1935, c. 172, § 1, p. 627;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 80-301;

Laws 1943, c. 211, § 1, p. 696;

R.S.1943, § 80-301;

Laws 1949, c. 272, § 1, p. 891;

Laws 1953, c. 325, § 1, p. 1075;

Laws 1959, c. 421, § 1, p. 1417;

Laws 1969, c. 753, § 1, p. 2833;

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 93, p. 2402;

Laws 1971, LB 334, § 1;

Laws 1973, LB 33, § 1;

Laws 1975, LB 90, § 2;

Laws 1979, LB 80, § 112;

Laws 1980, LB 184, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 351, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 2, § 23;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 95;

Laws 1994, LB 1194, § 16;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 80-301;

Laws 1997, LB 396, § 4;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 110.